Washington statutes.
RCW 33.48.170

Organizing permit—Conditions.

The director may impose conditions in the director's organizing permit issued under RCW 33.48.150 concerning the deposit in escrow of funds collected pursuant to said permit, the manner of expenditure of such funds and such other conditions as he or she deems reasonable and necessary or advisable for the protection of the public and the subscribers to such stock or funds for preincorporation expenses.

[ 1994 c 92 s 483; 1982 c 3 s 100; 1973 c 130 s 8.]

NOTES:

Severability—1982 c 3: See note following RCW 33.04.002.

Severability—1973 c 130: See note following RCW 33.24.350.